Utah statutes.
63M-5-202.   Prepaid Sales and Use Tax Construction Account -- Use of
account funds.
There is created a Prepaid Sales and Use Tax Construction Account as a special
suspense account within the state General Fund.  All revenues collected or
received by the State Tax Commission from the prepayment of sales or use taxes
under this chapter shall be deposited with the state treasurer daily and
credited by the state treasurer to the Prepaid Sales and Use Tax Construction
Account.  This account shall be used to finance state-related public
improvements, including but not limited to highways and related facilities and
schools and related facilities.  Funds from this account shall only be
disbursed or drawn upon after proper authorization and only after
appropriation of these funds by the Legislature.
